District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.29

Account and distribution.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 797
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-221.29.
1981 Ed., § 29-429.
1973 Ed., § 29-729.